Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Department of Agriculture

4-3-201. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of agriculture.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of agriculture, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of agriculture, §4-3-101.

Organization, powers and duties of department, title 43, ch. 1.

4-3-202. Commissioner.

The department of agriculture shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 373a32; Code 1932, § 257; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; 1939, ch. 11, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; modified.

4-3-203. Powers and duties.

The department of agriculture has the power to:

Encourage and promote, in every practicable manner, the interests of agriculture, including horticulture, livestock industry, dairying, poultry raising, beekeeping, production of wool and other allied industries;

Promote and improve methods of conducting agricultural industries, with a view to increasing the production, and facilitating the distribution, of products at minimum cost;

Collect, publish and distribute statistics relating to crop production and marketing of beef, pork, poultry, fish, mutton, wool, butter, cheese and other agricultural products, so far as such statistical information may be of value to the agricultural and allied interests of the state;

Inquire into the cause of contagious, infectious and communicable diseases among domestic animals, and the means for the prevention and cure of the same;

Assist, encourage and promote the organization of farmers' institutes, horticultural and agricultural societies, the holding of fairs, stock shows or other exhibits of the products of agriculture;

Cooperate with producers and consumers in devising and maintaining economical and efficient systems of distribution, and to aid in whatever way may be consistent or necessary in accomplishing the reduction of waste and expenses in marketing;

Cooperate with the agricultural college, the experiment stations of the state university and the federal government;

Enter and inspect any rights-of-way of any highway, railway, field, orchard, nursery, fruit packing house, storeroom, depot or other place where fruits are grown or stored, and inspect fruits, trees, plants, vines, shrubs or other articles within the state, and if such plant life is infected with pests or with their eggs or larvae, or with any contagious disease injurious to plant life, abate the same as a nuisance;

Enforce all of the penal and regulatory laws of the state in the same manner and with like authority as the sheriffs of the counties; and

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes, duties and responsibilities of the department. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, except as otherwise provided by law.

The enactment of a federal declaration of an extraordinary emergency or issuance of an emergency federal order or similar federal enactment that relates to the spread of plant or animal disease, the spread of pests from state to state, the protection of the food or feed supply, or that otherwise relates matters generally regulated by the department shall be deemed to constitute sufficient evidence of an immediate danger to the public health, safety or welfare of such a nature to justify the enactment of emergency rules for purposes of § 4-5-208(a).

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 29; Shan. Supp., § 373a71; Code 1932, § 294; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 69; C. Supp. 1950, § 294; Acts 1973, ch. 38, § 1; 1974, ch. 415, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-308; Acts 2005, ch. 46, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the division of forestry in the department of environment and conservation and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (title 11, ch. 4) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

Attorney General Opinions. Department of agriculture enforcement agent as law enforcement officer, OAG 99-016, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (2/2/99).

4-3-204. Civil penalty for violating regulatory matters — Revocation of license or permit — Denial of license or permit renewal.

The department or any board or commission attached to the department may, in a lawful proceeding respecting licensing, as defined in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, in addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, assess a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation of statute, rule or order enforceable by the department or board or commission attached to the department.

The department and any board or commission attached to the department shall by rule establish a schedule designating the minimum and maximum civil penalty that may be assessed under this section for violation of each statute, rule or order over which it has regulatory control.

In the event of nonpayment of any civil penalty lawfully assessed pursuant to subsection (a), such penalty shall be recoverable in the name of the state by the attorney general and reporter in the chancery court of Davidson County, or by the district attorney general in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violation occurred.

All sums recovered under this section shall be paid into the state treasury, except that in those counties where a contract exists between the department and the county health department pursuant to § 53-8-204(7), such sums may be retained by the county health department in accordance with the contract between the department and such county health department; provided, that all such funds so retained by the county health department shall be paid into the county's general fund.

In the event of nonpayment of any civil penalty lawfully assessed by the department or any board or commission attached thereto, the commissioner of agriculture may revoke a current license or permit or deny renewal of a license or permit until the respective civil penalties have been paid in full. Payment of the civil penalty does not necessarily obligate the commissioner to issue any license or permit; provided, no such action affecting licenses or permits shall be taken without a hearing as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 7; 1991, ch. 149, § 1; 2000, ch. 603, § 1.

4-3-205. License, certification or registration — Notifications — Prerequisites — Website — Notifications by electronic mail.

The department and any board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity created pursuant to titles 43 and 44 shall notify each applicant for a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for the license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines.

The department and any board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity created pursuant to titles 43 and 44 shall notify each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of a holder's license, certification or registration.

The department and any board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity created pursuant to titles 43 and 44 shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a professional or occupational license, certification, or registration from the entity.

The department and any board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title and titles 43 and 44 shall allow each holder of a professional or occupational license, certification or registration from the department, board, commission, committee, or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder's license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

The department and any board, commission, committee or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title and titles 43 and 44 shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 6; 2012, ch. 952, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.